Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 2

Special Provisions for Criminal Cases

33-10-201. Admission of persons charged with or convicted of a crime.

A person charged with or convicted of a crime may be admitted under § 33-6-201 to an appropriate treatment resource, in accordance with the law relating to probation, parole or other disposition of persons charged with or convicted of criminal offenses.

Acts 1973, ch. 295, § 14; 1981, ch. 224, § 21; T.C.A., § 33-814; Acts 1993, ch. 234, § 5; T.C.A., § 33-8-201; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 8E; 2009, ch. 186, § 21; T.C.A. § 68-24-201.

33-10-202. Appearance before judicial officer of persons arrested for intoxication — Disposition.

Whenever any citizen is taken into custody solely because of a condition of intoxication or similar condition, it shall be the duty of the arresting officer to promptly present the citizen before a judicial officer.

If the judicial officer finds that the citizen is in need of and willing to accept medical treatment for the citizen's condition, then the judicial officer shall order the arresting officer to conduct the citizen to a place of treatment, if available, and the delivery of the citizen to the designated place of treatment shall effectively release and discharge the arresting officer and judicial officer from any further duties or liability in connection with the arrest.

Acts 1973, ch. 295, § 17; T.C.A., § 33-817; Acts 1993, ch. 234, § 5; T.C.A., § 33-8-202; Acts 2009, ch. 186, § 22; T.C.A., § 68-24-202.

33-10-203. Arrests for public intoxication.

All arrests and court proceedings for public intoxication or drunkenness in this state shall be under § 39-17-310, to the exclusion of any common law or statutory offense now being enforced.

No county, municipality or other political subdivision of this state shall adopt any local law, ordinance, resolution or regulation having the force of law rendering public intoxication or drunkenness in and of itself or being a common drunkard or being found in enumerated places in an intoxicated condition, an offense, a violation of the subject of criminal or civil penalties or sanctions of any kind.

Nothing contained in this section shall affect any laws, ordinances, resolutions or regulations against drunken driving, driving under the influence of alcohol or other similar offenses that involve the operation of motor vehicles, machinery or other hazardous equipment.

Any fines collected under § 39-17-310 shall be retained by the unit of local government over which the court has jurisdiction.

Acts 1973, ch. 295, § 23; T.C.A., § 33-818; Acts 1993, ch. 234, § 5; T.C.A., § 33-8-203; Acts 1996, ch. 675, § 70; 2009, ch. 186, § 23; T.C.A., § 68-24-203.